zh-TW: 浮潛呼吸管形狀: 輪廓; 柔韌; J 型; 其他
cs: Tvar šnorchlu: Konturovaný; Pružná; Tvar písmene J; Jiné
vi: Hình dạng ống thở: Hình dạng được định hình; Mềm dẻo; Hình chữ J; Khác
es: Forma del esnórquel: Contorneado; Flexible; En forma de J; Otros
hr-HR: Oblik disalice: Konturirana; Fleksibilna; U obliku slova J; Ostalo
en: Snorkel shape: Contoured; Flexible; J-shaped; Other
el: Σχήμα αναπνευστήρα: Με περίγραμμα; Εύκαμπτο; Σε σχήμα V; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tvar šnorchla: Tvarovaný; Flexibilný; v tvare písmena J; Iné
ro-RO: Formă tub de respirat sub apă: Conturată; Flexibilă; În formă de J; Altele
th: รูปร่างของสนอร์เกิล: โค้งมน; ขอบยืดหยุ่น; รูปตัว J; อื่นๆ
it: Forma da boccaglio: Sagomata; Flessibile; A forma di J; Altro
zh-CN: 换气装置形状: 轮廓; 灵活式; J 形; 其他
nb: Snorkelform: Konturformet; Fleksibel; J-formet; Annen
fr: Forme du tuba: Profilé; Flexible; en forme de J; Autre
ko: 스노클 모양: 윤곽; 유연함; J자형; 기타
ru: Форма трубки: Контурные; Гибкие; J-образные; Другие
pt-PT: Formato de snorkel: Contornado; Flexível; Em forma de J; Outro
pt-BR: Formato de snorkel: Contornado; Flexível; Em forma de J; Outro
sv: Form på snorkel: Konturerad; Flexibel; J-formad; Annat
lt-LT: Nardymo kaukės su vamzdeliu forma: Kontūruoti; Lankstūs; J formos; Kita
hu: Sznorkel alakja: Körvonalas; Rugalmas; J alakú; Egyéb
nl: Vorm snorkel: Voorgevormd; Flexibel; J-vormig; Andere
tr: Şnorkel şekli: Konturlu; Esnek; J şekilli; Diğer
fi: Snorkkelin muoto: Muotoiltu; Joustava; J-muotoinen; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на шнорхел: С контур; Гъвкав; J-образен; Други
ja: シュノーケルシェイプ: 輪郭; フレキシブル; J型; その他
da: Snorkelform: Kontureret; Fleksibel; J-formet; Andet
pl: Kształt fajki do nurkowania: Wyprofilowane; Elastyczne; J-kształtny; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Oblika dihalke: Oblikovana; Prilagodljivo; V obliki črke J; Drugo
de: Schnorchelform: Konturiert; Flexibel; J-förmig; Sonstiges